Illinois, session 104th, HB342.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Drug Paraphernalia Control Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 600/1)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 2101)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8"Drug Paraphernalia Control Act".9(Source: P.A. 82-1032.)